Utah statutes.
67-5-15.   Records of the attorney general.

(1)  A record provided to the Office of the Attorney General by a client governmental entity shall be considered a record of the client governmental entity for purposes of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, if the client governmental entity retains a copy of the record.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-2-201(5), records may be exchanged between the Office of the Attorney General and a client governmental entity, without meeting the requirements of Section 63G-2-206 provided that they are used only for the purpose of representing the client governmental entity.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

